Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1122.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-5-20.16 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-5 entitled "Levy and
Assessment of Local Taxes" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-5-20.16. Smithfield — Property tax classification and valuation. Smithfield --
Property tax classification, levy determination and valuation.
(a) The assessor of the town of Smithfield, on or before June 1 of each year, shall make
full- and fair-cash valuation of all the estate, real and personal, and motor vehicles subject to
taxation, herein, and determine the assessed valuation of each property class each property class as
identified in subsection (b) of this section and notwithstanding the provisions of § 44-5-11.8 to the
contrary, determine the percentage of the tax levy to be apportioned each class of property and shall
apply tax rates sufficient to produce the proportion of the total tax levy.
(b) Class 1 and Class 2: The assessor shall apply different rates of taxation against Class 1
residential real estate and Class 2 commercial estate, in accordance with § 44-5-11.8, to determine
the tax due and payable on the property; provided, however, the rate for each class shall be uniform.
(c) Class 3: All ratable, tangible personal property shall be capped at the 2017 tax rate and
not increased until which time the rate is not greater than twice the rate applicable to any other class
in accordance with § 44-5-11.8.
(d) Class 4: The tax rates applicable to motor vehicles within Class 4, as defined in
subsection (b) of this section, are governed by § 44-34.1-1 [repealed].
(b) Classes of property.

(1) Class 1. Residential real estate consisting of no more than five (5) dwelling units; land
classified as open space; and dwellings on leased land including mobile homes.
(2) Class 2. Commercial and industrial real estate; residential properties containing partial
commercial or business uses; and residential real estate of more than five (5) dwelling units.
(3) Class 3. All ratable tangible personal property excluding motor vehicles and trailers
subject in all respects to the requirements of § 44-5.3-3.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002964
========
LC002964 - Page 2 of 3